Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1508
Meat processor; participation; annual
contract; record required; payment; liability.

(1) To participate in the program, each
meat processor shall enter into an annual contract with the commission which
details the meat processor's participation.

(2) Meat processors
shall accept the entire field-dressed carcass of a donated deer according
to the terms of their respective contracts with the commission and shall not
assess any fees or costs to donors, recipients, or participants. Information
from the donor is required for each donated deer and shall be submitted on
forms provided by the commission. Payment shall not be made to a meat processor
without this information.

(3) Meat processors shall accept a donated deer if the meat processor
determines the venison is in acceptable condition.

(4) Prior to receiving
payment, a meat processor shall be required to provide to the commission a
record of each donated deer that includes information required by the commission.
Payments shall be made to meat processors within forty-five days after submittal
of a complete and accurate invoice according to the terms of their respective
contracts with the commission.

(5) The commission shall not be liable for
the safety, quality, or condition of deer accepted by meat processors or recipients
or consumed by participants in the program.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 12.